Indiana, session 2026, HB1275.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-4-22-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.153-2018,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) This section applies only to low THC
hemp extract containing:
(1) delta-8 THC;
(2) delta-10 THC;
(3) hexahydrocannabinol (HHC);
(4) tetrahydrocannabinol acetate ester (THCo);
(5) tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA);
(6) tetrahydrocannabiphorol (THCp); or
(7) tetrahydrocannabivarin (THCv).
(a) (b) Except as provided in subsection (b), (f), a person may sell
low THC hemp extract to which this section applies at retail only if all
of the following apply:
(1) The packaging complies with the requirements of
IC 24-4-21-4.
(2) The person prohibits an individual who is less than
2026 IN 1275—LS 7040/DI 106


twenty-one (21) years of age from entering the person's retail
establishment.
(3) The person conspicuously displays, on or near every
entrance to the person's retail establishment, a sign in
boldface type that states "NOTICE: It is unlawful for a
person less than twenty-one (21) years old to enter this
establishment.".
(c) A person that violates this section commits a Class C
infraction.
(d) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(c), a civil judgment for an
infraction committed under this section must be imposed as
follows:
(1) If the person at that specific business location has not been
issued a citation or summons for a violation of this section in
the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to four hundred
dollars ($400).
(2) If the person at that specific business location has had one
(1) citation or summons issued for a violation of this section
in the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to eight
hundred dollars ($800).
(3) If the person at that specific business location has had two
(2) citations or summonses issued for a violation of this section
in the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to one
thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400).
(4) If the person at that specific business location has had
three (3) or more citations or summonses issued for a
violation of this section in the previous one (1) year, a civil
penalty of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000).
A person may not be issued a citation or summons for a violation
of this section more than once every twenty-four (24) hours for
each specific business location.
(e) The following defenses are available to a person accused of
violating subsection (b)(2):
(1) The individual produced a driver's license bearing the
individual's photograph showing that the individual was at
least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(2) The individual produced a photographic identification
card issued under IC 9-24-16-1 or a similar card issued under
the laws of another state or the federal government showing
that the individual was at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3) The appearance of the individual was such that an
ordinary prudent person would believe that the individual
2026 IN 1275—LS 7040/DI 106


was not less than thirty (30) years of age.
(4) The individual transported or delivered goods to the
person within the scope of the individual's employment.
(f) This section does not prohibit the sale or dispensing of low
THC hemp extract to an individual at least twenty-one (21) years
of age at a pharmacy or health care facility (as defined by
IC 16-18-2-161(a)).
(b) Before July 1, 2018, a person may sell low THC hemp extract at
retail even if the packaging does not comply with the requirements of
IC 24-4-21-4.
SECTION 2. IC 24-4-22-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. This section applies after June 30, 2018. A person who
violates section 3 of this chapter commits a Class C infraction.
However, the violation is a Class B infraction if the person has one (1)
prior unrelated judgment for a violation of section 3 of this chapter, and
a Class A infraction if the person has two (2) or more prior unrelated
judgments for a violation of section 3 of this chapter. These penalties
are in addition to any criminal penalties that may be imposed for
unlawful possession or distribution of a controlled substance.
2026 IN 1275—LS 7040/DI 106